Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.910

Prior liability preserved.

The enactment of this chapter shall not have the effect of terminating, or in any way modifying any liability, civil or criminal, which shall already be in existence on the effective date of this chapter.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 22 s 38.]